Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Penalties

205.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 205.170 or subsections (1) to (3) of KRS 205.175 shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who violates subsection (4) of KRS 205.175 shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who willfully violates any of the provisions of KRS 205.310, or any rule or regulation thereunder, shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor. Each failure or violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Any bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or other financial institution which fails to comply with the provisions of subsection (1) of KRS 205.835 or which submits fraudulent information to the cabinet shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any bank, savings and loan association, credit union, investment company, savings institution, trust company, insurance or annuity company, pension or profit-sharing trust company, or other financial institution failing to comply with provisions of KRS 405.430(11) shall be subject to a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for each failure to comply.

Any person or financial institution that fails to comply with the provisions of KRS 205.772 or any administrative regulation promulgated under KRS 205.772, within ninety (90) days after notification by the cabinet shall, unless the failure is due to reasonable cause as defined in KRS 131.010, be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and no more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each full month of noncompliance. The fine shall begin on the first day of the month beginning after the expiration of the ninety (90) days.

History.
938i-7: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 110, §§ 11, 12; 1952, ch. 33, § 13; 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 6, effective February 10, 1979; 1980, ch. 188, § 197, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 325, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 286, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 411, § 32, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 463, § 21, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 96, § 19, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 316, § 19, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 255, § 12, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 68, § 3, effective June 26, 2007.

205.991.
Penalties for medical assistance offenses. [Repealed.]

205.992.
Penalties for child support recovery offenses.

Any person violating the provisions of KRS 205.785 shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or be imprisoned in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 343, § 21.